dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX EG Y 21
SFX EG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EG ȯl l/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl li/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 i/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl la/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 a/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lov/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lu/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 u/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lah/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lam/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 am/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lom/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 om/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl lami/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX EG ȯl le/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 e/xPxE .

SFX EH Y 28
SFX EH 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EH y o/xBxPxE .
SFX EH y a/xPxE .
SFX EH y ogo/xPxE .
SFX EH y ų/xPxE .
SFX EH y oj/xPxE .
SFX EH y om/xPxE .
SFX EH y omu/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EH y ojų/xPxE .
SFX EH y i/xPxE .
SFX EH y e/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EH 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX EH zly gorši/zz .
SFX EH zly goršego/zz .
SFX EH zly goršemu/zz .
SFX EH zly goršim/zz .
SFX EH zly goršem/zz .
SFX EH zly gorše/zz .
SFX EH zly gorša/zz .
SFX EH zly goršų/zz .
SFX EH zly goršej/zz .
SFX EH zly goršejų/zz .
SFX EH zly gorših/zz .
SFX EH zly goršim/zz .
SFX EH zly goršimi/zz .
SFX EH zly gorje/zz .

SFX EI Y 78
SFX EI ȯjdti šėl .
SFX EI jdti šla .
SFX EI jdti šlo .
SFX EI jdti šli .
SFX EI ti ų .
SFX EI ti em .
SFX EI ti eš .
SFX EI ti e .
SFX EI ti emȯ .
SFX EI ti ete .
SFX EI ti ųt .
SFX EI ti eh .
SFX EI ti eše .
SFX EI ti ehmȯ .
SFX EI ti este .
SFX EI ti ehų .
SFX EI ti i .
SFX EI ti imȯ .
SFX EI ti ite .
SFX EI ti ųći .
SFX EI ti ųćego .
SFX EI ti ųćemu .
SFX EI ti ųćim .
SFX EI ti ųćem .
SFX EI ti ųćih .
SFX EI ti ųćimi .
SFX EI ti ųća .
SFX EI ti ųće .
SFX EI ti omy .
SFX EI ti omogo .
SFX EI ti omomu .
SFX EI ti omym .
SFX EI ti omom .
SFX EI ti omo .
SFX EI ti oma .
SFX EI ti omų .
SFX EI ti omoj .
SFX EI ti omojų .
SFX EI ti omi .
SFX EI ti ome .
SFX EI ti omyh .
SFX EI ti omym .
SFX EI ti omymi .
SFX EI ti omo .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvši .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšego .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšemu .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšim .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšem .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvših .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšimi .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvša .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšų .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšej .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvšejų .
SFX EI ȯjdti šėvše .
SFX EI ti eny .
SFX EI ti enogo .
SFX EI ti enomu .
SFX EI ti enym .
SFX EI ti enom .
SFX EI ti eni .
SFX EI ti ene .
SFX EI ti enyh .
SFX EI ti enymi .
SFX EI ti ena .
SFX EI ti enų .
SFX EI ti enoj .
SFX EI ti enojų .
SFX EI ti eno .
SFX EI ti eńje/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńja/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńju/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńjem/xPxE .
SFX EI ti enij/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńjam/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńjami/xPxE .
SFX EI ti eńjah/xPxE .

SFX EJ Y 11
SFX EJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EJ 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EJ ȯk ki/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk ka/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk kov/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk ku/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk kah/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk kam/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk kom/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk kami/xPxE .
SFX EJ ȯk če/xPxE .

SFX EK Y 11
SFX EK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX EK 0 e/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 a/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 u/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 am/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 em/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX EK c če/xPxE .

SFX EL Y 5
SFX EL a ų .
SFX EL a y .
SFX EL a ě .
SFX EL a ojų .
SFX EL a o .

SFX EM Y 60
SFX EM ti l .
SFX EM ti la .
SFX EM ti lo .
SFX EM ti li .
SFX EM ęti mų .
SFX EM ęti mem .
SFX EM ęti meš .
SFX EM ęti me .
SFX EM ęti memȯ .
SFX EM ęti mete .
SFX EM ęti mųt .
SFX EM ti h .
SFX EM ti še .
SFX EM ti hmȯ .
SFX EM ti ste .
SFX EM ti hų .
SFX EM ęti mi .
SFX EM ęti mimȯ .
SFX EM ęti mite .
SFX EM ęti mųći .
SFX EM ęti mųćego .
SFX EM ęti mųćemu .
SFX EM ęti mųćim .
SFX EM ęti mųćem .
SFX EM ęti mųćih .
SFX EM ęti mųćimi .
SFX EM ęti mųća .
SFX EM ęti mųće .
SFX EM ęti memy .
SFX EM ęti memogo .
SFX EM ęti memomu .
SFX EM ęti memym .
SFX EM ęti memom .
SFX EM ęti memo .
SFX EM ęti mema .
SFX EM ęti memų .
SFX EM ęti memoj .
SFX EM ęti memojų .
SFX EM ęti memi .
SFX EM ęti meme .
SFX EM ęti memyh .
SFX EM ęti memym .
SFX EM ęti memymi .
SFX EM ęti memo .
SFX EM ti vši .
SFX EM ti všego .
SFX EM ti všemu .
SFX EM ti všim .
SFX EM ti všem .
SFX EM ti vših .
SFX EM ti všimi .
SFX EM ti vša .
SFX EM ti všų .
SFX EM ti všej .
SFX EM ti všejų .
SFX EM ti vše .
SFX EM i y .
SFX EM i a .
SFX EM i o .
SFX EM ti ťje .

SFX EN Y 9
SFX EN 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EN o o/xPxBxO .
SFX EN o a/xPxE .
SFX EN ko ek/xPxE .
SFX EN o u/xPxE .
SFX EN o ah/xPxE .
SFX EN o am/xPxE .
SFX EN 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EN o ami/xPxE .

SFX EO Y 60
SFX EO ti l .
SFX EO ti la .
SFX EO ti lo .
SFX EO ti li .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmų .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmem .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmeš .
SFX EO jęti ȯjme .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemȯ .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmete .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųt .
SFX EO ti h .
SFX EO ti še .
SFX EO ti hmȯ .
SFX EO ti ste .
SFX EO ti hų .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmi .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmimȯ .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmite .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųći .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćego .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćemu .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćim .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćem .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćih .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųćimi .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųća .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmųće .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemy .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemogo .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemomu .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemym .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemom .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemo .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmema .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemų .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemoj .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemojų .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemi .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmeme .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemyh .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemym .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemymi .
SFX EO jęti ȯjmemo .
SFX EO ti vši .
SFX EO ti všego .
SFX EO ti všemu .
SFX EO ti všim .
SFX EO ti všem .
SFX EO ti vših .
SFX EO ti všimi .
SFX EO ti vša .
SFX EO ti všų .
SFX EO ti všej .
SFX EO ti všejų .
SFX EO ti vše .
SFX EO i y .
SFX EO i a .
SFX EO i o .
SFX EO ti ťje .

SFX EP Y 32
SFX EP ti l .
SFX EP ti la .
SFX EP ti lo .
SFX EP ti li .
SFX EP ovati ujų .
SFX EP ovati ujem .
SFX EP ovati uješ .
SFX EP ovati uje .
SFX EP ovati ujemȯ .
SFX EP ovati ujete .
SFX EP ovati ujųt .
SFX EP ti h .
SFX EP ti še .
SFX EP ti hmȯ .
SFX EP ti ste .
SFX EP ti hų .
SFX EP ovati uj .
SFX EP ovati ujmȯ .
SFX EP ovati ujte .
SFX EP ovati ujųći .
SFX EP ovati ujųća .
SFX EP ovati ujųće .
SFX EP ovati ujemy .
SFX EP ovati ujema .
SFX EP ovati ujemo .
SFX EP ti vši .
SFX EP ti vša .
SFX EP ti vše .
SFX EP ti ny .
SFX EP ti na .
SFX EP ti no .
SFX EP ti ńje .

SFX EQ Y 5
SFX EQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EQ e o/xPxBxO .
SFX EQ e yh/xPxE .
SFX EQ e ym/xPxE .
SFX EQ e ymi/xPxE .

SFX ER Y 5
SFX ER a ų .
SFX ER a e .
SFX ER a i .
SFX ER a ejų .
SFX ER a o .

SFX ES Y 9
SFX ES 0 0/xPxE .
SFX ES 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX ES enj ėnj/xPxE .
SFX ES enj nji/xPxE .
SFX ES enj njij/xPxE .
SFX ES enj njah/xPxE .
SFX ES enj njam/xPxE .
SFX ES enj njjų/xPxE .
SFX ES enj njami/xPxE .

SFX ET Y 5
SFX ET ę ebę .
SFX ET ę ebe .
SFX ET ę obě .
SFX ET ę i .
SFX ET ę obojų .

SFX EU Y 9
SFX EU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EU e e/xPxBxO .
SFX EU e a/xPxE .
SFX EU śje sij/xPxE .
SFX EU e u/xPxE .
SFX EU e ah/xPxE .
SFX EU e am/xPxE .
SFX EU 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EU e ami/xPxE .

SFX EV Y 10
SFX EV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EV i o/xPxBxO .
SFX EV i ų/xPxE .
SFX EV i ev/xPxE .
SFX EV i e/xPxE .
SFX EV i ah/xPxE .
SFX EV i am/xPxE .
SFX EV i ejų/xPxE .
SFX EV i ami/xPxE .
SFX EV i o/xPxE .

SFX EW Y 8
SFX EW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EW i e/xPxBxO .
SFX EW i ego/xPxE .
SFX EW 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EW i em/xPxE .
SFX EW i emu/xPxE .
SFX EW 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EW 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX EX Y 9
SFX EX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EX e e/xPxBxO .
SFX EX e a/xPxE .
SFX EX ŕje rij/xPxE .
SFX EX e u/xPxE .
SFX EX e ah/xPxE .
SFX EX e am/xPxE .
SFX EX 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EX e ami/xPxE .

SFX EY Y 12
SFX EY 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EY 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX EY yrovoz irovoz/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozy/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovoza/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozov/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozu/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozah/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozam/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozom/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovozami/xPxE .
SFX EY yrovoz irovoze/xPxE .

SFX EZ Y 6
SFX EZ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EZ a e/xPxBxO .
SFX EZ a 0 .
SFX EZ 0 h/xPxE .
SFX EZ 0 m/xPxE .
SFX EZ 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Ea Y 6
SFX Ea 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ea i e/xPxBxO .
SFX Ea 0 j/xPxE .
SFX Ea i ah/xPxE .
SFX Ea i am/xPxE .
SFX Ea i ami/xPxE .
