dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
diavȯl/EG
zly/EH
vȯjdti/EI
prědȯk/EJ
peprec/EK
potomȯk/EJ
moldova/EL
prijęti/EM
posȯl/EG
městečko/EN
objęti/EO
kopijovati/EP
kopirovati/EP
dane/EQ
ekspanzija/ER
uråvenj/ES
sę/ET
popŕśje/EU
kolibri/EV
pųtujųći/EW
ostŕje/EX
pancyrovoz/EY
jajca/EZ
oči/Ea
uši/Ea
zajęti/EM
prějęti/EM
podjęti/EO
izjęti/EO
pråzdnověŕje/EX
medija/EZ
dějańja/EZ
dědȯk/EJ
drobne/EQ
jaječko/EN
najęti/EM
pradědȯk/EJ
primoŕje/EX
jęti/EM
nastavjeńja/EZ
odjęti/EO
podråstȯk/EJ
pojęti/EM
prijęti/EM
projęti/EM
ujęti/EM
vȯzråstȯk/EJ
zajęti/EM
sjęti/EO
medvěď-grizli/EV
nedonosȯk/EJ
primiŕje/EX
skovrånȯk/EJ
svědȯk/EJ
råvnověśje/EU
zarodȯk/EJ
sujevěŕje/EX
pověŕje/EX
poni/EV
iznajęti/EM
pozajęti/EM
vȯzjęti/EO
bezvětŕje/EX
jurȯk/EJ
medugoŕje/EX
izrodȯk/EJ
zimorodȯk/EJ
sŕdca/EZ
větrec/EK
nesȯglåśje/EU
nesųglåśje/EU
ščigȯl/EG
prědprijęti/EM
věręći/EW
počętkujųći/EW
lori/EV
prisposobjeńja/EZ
uško/EN
zombi/EV
podgoŕje/EX
